apertium-tur-uzb.uzb.twol
Alphabet
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W Y Z X
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w y z x


%{s%}:s %{i%}:i
%{E%}:y
%{K%}:k

%>:0 %  ; 

Sets

Vow =     A E I O U 
          a e i o u ; 
          
Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v z x ;

Rules

 

"{s} becomes s when following a vowel"
%{s%}:0 <=> :Cons %>: _ ;

"{E} becomes y when following a vowel"

%{E%}:a <=> :Cons %>: _ ;

"{K} becomes g when it is before a vowel"

%{K%}:g <=>  _ %>: :Vow (:0) ;



"{i} becomes i when following a consonant"

%{i%}:0 <=> :Vow %>: _ ;
